Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-24,112
Registration; criminal history record check.

The commission shall require an applicant for initial issuance of a registration to submit two legible sets of fingerprints to be furnished to the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Nebraska State Patrol for a national criminal history information record check and the fee for such record check payable to the patrol. The applicant shall authorize release of the national criminal history record check to the commission.

Laws 2026, LB1235, § 9.
April 8, 2026